src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!! ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language nouns inflect in cases.

! yö:yö
LEXICON N-yö-Sg
+Dial/Lauk+N: N-yö-Sg_01 ;

LEXICON N-yö-Sg_01
 SG-NOM   ; ! yö
 SG-GEN   ; ! yön
 SG-PAR_tA   ; ! yötä
 SG-ILL_hV  ; ! yöhä
 SG-INE   ; ! yös
 SG-ELA   ; ! yöst
 SG-ALL   ; ! yölle
 SG-ADE   ; ! yöl
 SG-ABL   ; ! yölt
 SG-TRA   ; ! yöks
 SG-ESS_nnA   ; ! yönnä
 SG-EXE   ; ! yönt
 SG-COM   ; ! yönkä


! maa (I)
LEXICON N-maa
+N+Der/tOin:t A-kalatoin ; ! maatoin
+N: N-maa_01 ;

LEXICON N-maa_01
 SG-NOM   ; ! maa
 SG-GEN   ; ! maan
 SG-PAR_tA   ; ! maata
 SG-ILL_hV  ; ! maaha
 SG-INE   ; ! maaz
 SG-ELA   ; ! maast
 SG-ALL   ; ! maalle
 SG-ADE   ; ! maal
 SG-ABL   ; ! maalt
 SG-TRA   ; ! maaks
 SG-ESS_nnA   ; ! maanna
 SG-EXE   ; ! maant
 SG-COM   ; ! maanka

 PL-NOM   ; ! maat
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>jen	#   ; ! maijen
 PL-PAR_tA  ; ! maita
 PL-ILL_hV   ; ! maihe
 PL-INE   ; ! mais
 PL-ELA   ; ! maist
 PL-ALL   ; ! maille
 PL-ADE   ; ! mail
 PL-ABL   ; ! mailt
 PL-TRA   ; ! maiks
 PL-ESS_nnA   ; ! mainna
 PL-EXE   ; ! maint
 PL-COM   ; ! maanka

! preesens:preesens
LEXICON N-preesens
+N: N-preesens_01 ;

LEXICON N-preesens_01
 SG-NOM   ; ! preesens
:a SG-GEN	  ;   !	
:a SG-PAR_A  ; ! maita
:a SG-ILL_V   ; ! maihe
:a SG-INE   ; ! mais
:a SG-ELA   ; ! maist
:a SG-ALL   ; ! maille
:a SG-ADE   ; ! mail
:a SG-ABL   ; ! mailt
:a SG-TRA   ; ! maiks
:a SG-ESS_nnA   ; ! mainna
:a SG-EXE   ; ! maint
:a SG-COM   ; ! maanka
:a PL-NOM   ; ! maat
:o PL-GEN ; ! maijen
:o PL-PAR_tA  ; ! maita
:o PL-ILL_hV   ; ! maihe
:o PL-INE   ; ! mais
:o PL-ELA   ; ! maist
:o PL-ALL   ; ! maille
:o PL-ADE   ; ! mail
:o PL-ABL   ; ! mailt
:o PL-TRA   ; ! maiks
:o PL-ESS_nnA   ; ! mainna
:o PL-EXE   ; ! maint
:o PL-COM   ; ! maanka

LEXICON N-glasnoi
+N: A-glavnoi_01 ;

! mato (II)
LEXICON N-mato
+N+Der/tOin:%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; ! maotoin
+N: N-mato_01 ;

LEXICON N-mato_01
     SG-NOM   ; ! mato
 SG-GEN   ; ! maon
!:%>%^LCns%^LVws SG-PAR_A   ; ! mattooa !Is this right
 SG-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! mattoa
 SG-ILL_V   ; ! mattoo
 SG-INE ; ! lopus, lopuus
 SG-ELA   ; ! maost
 SG-ALL   ; ! maolle
 SG-ADE   ; ! maool
 SG-ABL   ; ! maolt
 SG-TRA   ; ! maoks
+Sg+Ess:%>%^LCns%^LVwsn    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Ess:%>%^LCns%^LVwsnnAÄ1    #   ; ! mattoonna
+Sg+Ess:%>%^LCnsnnAÄ1    #   ; ! mattonna
+Sg+Exe:%>%^LCns%^LVwsnt    #   ; ! mattoont
+Sg+Com:%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
 lOi-Pl ;
:%>%^WCns PL-NOM   ; ! maot

LEXICON N-koivu
+N+Der/tOin:%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; ! koivutoin
+N: N-mato_01 ;
+N: Oblique-Plural_hV ;
+N: PL-PAR_A ;

! forma osa (II-b)
LEXICON N-osa
+N+Der/tOin:%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !
+N: N-osa_01 ;

LEXICON N-osa_01
 SG-NOM   ; ! osa
 SG-GEN   ; ! osan
 SG-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! ossaa
 SG-ILL_V   ; ! ossaa
 SG-INE   ; ! osas
 SG-ELA   ; ! osast
 SG-ALL   ; ! osalle
 SG-ADE   ; ! osal
 SG-ABL   ; ! osalt
 SG-TRA   ; ! osaks
 SG-ESS_Vn   ; ! mattoon
 SG-ESS_nnA ;
 SG-EXE   ; ! mattoont
 SG-COM   ; ! maanka
! Plural
 PL-NOM   ; ! osat
 PL-GEN   ; ! ossiin
 PL-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! ossia
 PL-ILL_V   ; ! ossii
 PL-INE   ; ! formis, ! formiis
 PL-ELA   ; ! matoloist
 PL-ALL   ; ! matoloille
 PL-ADE   ; ! matoloil
 PL-ABL   ; ! matoloilt
 PL-TRA   ; ! matoloiks
 PL-ESS_Vn   ; ! matoloinna
 PL-EXE  ; ! matoloint
 PL-COM  ; ! osinka

! joki:jok
! joki (II-c)
LEXICON N-joki
+N+Der/tOin:e%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; ! joetoin
+N: N-joki_01 ;

LEXICON N-joki_01
:i  SG-NOM   ; ! joki
:e SG-GEN   ; ! joen
:e SG-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! mattooa
:e SG-ILL_V   ; ! mattoo
:e SG-INE   ; ! maooz
:e SG-ELA   ; ! maost
:e SG-ALL   ; ! maolle
:e     SG-ADE   ; ! joel
:e SG-ABL   ; ! maolt
:e SG-TRA   ; ! maoks
+Sg+Ess:e%>%^LCns%^LVwsn    #   ; ! mattoon
:e SG-ESS_nnA   ; ! talvenna
+Sg+Exe:e%>%^LCns%^LVwsnt    #   ; ! mattoont
:e SG-COM   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:e       PL-NOM    ; ! joet
:%>%^LCns       PL-PAR_A   ; ! kumpia
:i       PL-PAR_A   ; ! kumpia
 Oblique-Plural_V ;

! lumi (II-d)
LEXICON N-lumi
+N+Der/tOin:me%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !
+N: N-lumi_01 ;

LEXICON N-lumi_01
+Sg+Nom:mi     #   ; ! lumi
+Sg+Gen:me%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! maon
+Sg+Acc:me%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! maon
:n SG-PAR_tA  ; ! lunta
+Sg+Ill:me%>%^LCnsV1	#   ; ! mattoo
:me SG-INE   ; ! maooz
+Sg+Ela:me%>%^WCnsst    #   ; ! maost
+Sg+All:me%>%^WCnslle    #   ; ! maolle
:me SG-ADE   ; ! maool
+Sg+Abl:me%>%^WCnslt    #   ; ! maolt
+Sg+Tra:me%>%^WCnsks    #   ; ! maoks
+Sg+Ess:me%>%^LCns%^LVwsn    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Exe:me%>%^LCns%^LVwsnt    #   ; ! mattoont
+Sg+Com:me%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
+Pl:mi lOi-Pl ;
+Pl+Nom:me%>%^WCnst     #   ; ! lumet
+Pl+Acc:me%>%^WCnst     #   ; ! lumet

! emoi (III)
LEXICON N-emoi
+N+Der/tOin:%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !emotoin
+N: N-emoi_01 ;

LEXICON N-emoi_01
+Sg+Nom:i     #   ; ! emoi
+Sg+Gen:i%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! emoin
+Sg+Par:i%>%^LCns%^LVwsAÄ1	#   ; ! emmooja
+Sg+Ill:i%>%^LCnsV1	#   ; ! emoihe
:i SG-INE   ; ! maoos
+Sg+Ela:i%>%^WCnsst    #   ; ! maost
+Sg+All:i%>%^WCnslle    #   ; ! maolle
:i SG-ADE   ; ! maool
+Sg+Abl:i%>%^WCnslt    #   ; ! maolt
+Sg+Tra:i%>%^WCnsks    #   ; ! maoks
+Sg+Ess:i%>%^LCns%^LVwsnnAÄ1    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Exe:i%>%^LCns%^LVwsnt    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Com:%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
 lOi-Pl ;
+Pl+Nom:i%>%^WCnst     #   ; ! emoit

! the stem-final "a" is added here
! jalka (IV)
LEXICON N-jalka
+N+Der/tOin:a%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !
+N: N-jalka_01 ;

LEXICON N-jalka_01
:a SG-NOM   ; ! jalka
:a SG-GEN   ; ! jalan
:a SG-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! jalkaa
:a SG-ILL_V   ; ! jalkaa
:a SG-INE   ; ! jalaas
:a SG-ELA   ; ! jalast
:a SG-ALL   ; ! jalalle
:a SG-ADE   ; ! jalaal
:a SG-ABL   ; ! jalalt
:a SG-TRA   ; ! jalaks
+Sg+Ess:a%>%^LCns%^LVwsn    #   ; ! jalkaan
+Sg+Ess:a%>nnAÄ1    #   ; ! jalkanna
+Sg+Exe:a%>%^LCns%^LVwsnt    #   ; ! jalkaan
:a SG-COM   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:a       PL-NOM    ; ! jalat
:o	 PL-GEN	   ; ! jalkoin cf. kannoin
:o 		 PL-PAR_A ; !  jalkoja, cf. kanoja
:o%>%^LCns	 PL-PAR_A ; ! jalkoja, cf. kannoja
+Pl+Ill:o%>i%>hV1	#   ; ! jalkoihe
+Pl+Ine:o%>i%>%^WCnss    #   ; ! jalois
+Pl+Ela:o%>i%>%^WCnsst    #   ; ! jaloist
+Pl+All:o%>i%>%^WCnslle    #   ; ! jaloille
+Pl+Ade:o%>i%>%^WCnsl    #   ; ! jaloil
+Pl+Abl:o%>i%>%^WCnslt    #   ; ! jaloilt
+Pl+Tra:o%>i%>%^WCnsks    #   ; ! jaloiks
+Pl+Ess:o%>i%>nnAÄ1    #   ; ! jalkoin
+Pl+Exe:o%>i%>nt    #   ; ! jalkoin
+Pl+Com:o%>i%>nkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka

! copied from N-jalka
! jalka (IV-a)
LEXICON N-kana
+N+Der/tOin:a%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !
+N: N-kana_01 ;

LEXICON N-kana_01
+Sg+Nom:a     K   ; ! kana
:a SG-GEN   ; ! kanan
:a SG-PAR_A-LCns ;
!+Sg+Par:a%>%^LCnsAÄ1	#   ; ! jalkaa
:a SG-ILL_V  ; ! jalkaa
:a SG-INE   ; ! jalaas
:a SG-ELA   ; ! jalast
:a SG-ALL  ; ! jalalle
:a SG-ADE   ; ! jalaal
:a SG-ABL   ; ! jalalt
:a SG-TRA   ; ! jalaks
:a SG-ESS_Vn   ; ! jalkaan
:a SG-ESS_nnA   ; ! jalkanna
:a SG-EXE   ; ! jalkaan
:a SG-COM   ; ! maanka
:a SG-ABE ; ! rahata
! Plural
:a   PL-NOM   ; ! kanat
:o PL-GEN  ; ! kannoin
:o	     PL-PAR_A  ; ! kanoja
! The next one is causing problems
! I can't get the i:j
:o  PL-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! kannoja
!+Pl+Par:o%>%^LCnsjAÄ1 K ; ! 2012-10-18
:o%>%^LCns   PL-ILL_blank   ; ! kannoi
:o   PL-INE   ; ! kanois
:o   PL-ELA   ; ! kanoist
:o   PL-ALL   ; ! kanoille
:o   PL-ADE   ; ! kanoil
:o   PL-ABL   ; ! kanoilt
:o   PL-TRA   ; ! kanoiks
:o  	     PL-ESS_Vn   ; ! jalkoin
:o  	     PL-ESS_nnA   ; ! jalkoin
:o	     PL-EXE   ; ! jalkoin
:o    	     PL-COM   ; ! maanka

!!! Three-syllable words

! This is incase there are 3-syllable issues
LEXICON N-monikko
 N-mato ;

! tytär:tyttä
LEXICON N-tytär
+N:%>%^WCnsr    SG-NOM        ;
+N:%>%^WCnsr    SG-PAR_tA        ;
+N:r N-tytär_01 ;

LEXICON N-tytär_01
:e     SG-GEN           ;
:e     SG-ILL_V		;
:e     SG-INE		;
:e     SG-ELA		;
:e     SG-ALL		;
:e     SG-ADE		;
:e     SG-ABL		;
:e     SG-TRA		;
:e     SG-ESS_nnA		;
:e     SG-EXE		;
:e     SG-COM		;
:e     PL-NOM		;
     PL-GEN		;
     PL-PAR_A		;
     PL-ILL_V		;
     PL-INE		;
     PL-ELA		;
     PL-ALL		;
     PL-ADE		;
     PL-ABL		;
     PL-TRA		;
     PL-ESS_Vn		;
     PL-ESS_nnA		;
     PL-EXE		;
