src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
monikko:monikko N-monikko  "" ;
yksikkö:yksikkö N-monikko  "" ;
marja:marj N-jalka  "" ;
statja:statj N-jalka  "" ;
niska:nisk N-jalka  "" ;
metra:metr N-jalka  "" ;
merta:mert N-jalka  "" ;
sarka:sark N-jalka  "" ;
tikka:tikk N-jalka  "" ;
sika:sik N-jalka  "" ;
virta:virt N-jalka  "" ;
leuka:leuk N-jalka  "" ;
painutostiippa:painutos#tiipp N-jalka  "" ;
seegla:seegl N-jalka  "" ;
lauta:laut N-jalka  "" ;
ranta:rant N-jalka  "" ;
niegla:niegl N-jalka  "" ;
paikka:paikk N-jalka  "" ;
gerundium:gerundium N-preesens  "" ;
futurum:futurum N-preesens  "" ;
preesens:preesens N-preesens  "" ;
kirja:kirj N-jalka  "" ;
laajasana:laaja#san N-kana  "" ;
jälkisana:jälki#san N-kana  "" ;
esisana:esi#san N-kana  "" ;
jalka:jalk N-jalka  "" ;
tytär:tyttä N-tytär  "" ;
apusana:apu#san N-jalka  "" ;
parvi:parv N-joki  "" ;
emoi:emo N-emoi  "" ;
repoi:repo N-emoi  "" ;
glasnoi:glasnoi N-glasnoi  "" ;
kana:kan N-kana  "" ;
raja:raj N-kana  "" ;
paja:paj N-kana  "" ;
sauna:saun N-kana  "" ;
cislasana:cisla#san N-kana  "" ;
fakta:fakt N-jalka  "" ;
alkuaika:alku#aik N-jalka  "" ;
sana:san N-kana  "" ;
pääsana:pää#san N-kana  "" ;
ajasana:ajasan N-kana  "" ;
lukusana:luku#san N-kana  "" ;
apisana:api#san N-kana  "" ;
infinittatekosana:infinitta#teko#san N-kana  "" ;
kiljahhussana:kiljahhus#san N-kana  "" ;
kiljahhussana:kiljahus#san N-kana  "" ;
saha:sah N-kana  "" ;
raha:rah N-kana  "" ;
pata:pat N-kana  "" ;
tekosana:teko#san N-kana  "" ;
nimisana:nimi#san N-kana  "" ;
siha:sih N-jalka  "" ;
adessivasiha:adessiva#sih N-jalka  "" ;
esimerkki:esi#merkki N-mato  "" ;
ilo:ilo N-mato  "" ;
arvo:arvo N-mato  "" ;
jahti:jahti N-mato  "" ;
lumi:lu N-lumi  "" ;
leemi:lee N-lumi  "" ;
joki:jok N-joki  "" ;
jälki:jälk N-joki  "" ;
hauki:hauk N-joki  "" ;
hanhi:hanh N-joki  "" ;
hirvi:hirv N-joki  "" ;
järvi:järv N-joki  "" ;
särki:särk N-joki  "" ;
mäki:mäk N-joki  "" ;
talvi:talv N-joki  "" ;
väki:väk N-joki  "" ;
suomi:suom N-joki  "" ;
ovi:ov N-joki  "" ;
kivi:kiv N-joki  "" ;
rantakivi:ranta#kiv N-joki  "" ;
nimi:nim N-joki  "" ;
erinimi:eri#nim N-joki  "" ;
noki:nok N-joki  "" ;
tunti:tunti N-mato  "" ;
hoito:hoito N-mato  "" ;
airo:airo N-mato  "" ;
jutto:jutto N-mato  "" ;
peli:peli N-mato  "" ;
trenki:trenki N-mato  "" ;
elo:elo N-mato  "" ;
valo:valo N-mato  "" ;
väli:väli N-mato  "" ;
tykki:tykki N-mato  "" ;
laulu:laulu N-mato  "" ;
hattu:hattu N-koivu  "" ;
pelto:pelto N-mato  "" ;
loppu:loppu N-koivu  "" ;
steeppenivaihto:steeppeni#vaihto N-mato  "" ;
pyssy:pyssy N-mato  "" ;
risti:risti N-mato  "" ;
rahti:rahti N-mato  "" ;
kaivo:kaivo N-mato  "" ;
kurssi:kurssi N-mato  "" ;
pohja:pohja N-osa  "" ;
vokalpohja:vokal#pohja N-osa  "" ;
vokalanpohja:vokalan#pohja N-osa  "" ;
vokalapohja:vokala#pohja N-osa  "" ;
koivu:koivu N-koivu  "" ;
liitsaloppu:liitsa#loppu N-koivu  "" ;
viiru:viiru N-mato  "" ;
osa:osa N-osa  "" ;
pouta:pouta N-osa  "" ;
sananosa:sanan#osa N-osa  "" ;
vahvistusosa:vahvistus#osa N-osa  "" ;
ikä:ikä N-osa  "" ;
suka:suka N-osa  "" ;
kuva:kuva N-osa  "" ;
henkähösvoima:henkähös#voima N-osa  "" ;
otsa:otsa N-osa  "" ;
gruppa:gruppa N-osa  "" ;
partisippaforma:partisippa#forma N-osa  "" ;
imperativaforma:imperativa#forma N-osa  "" ;
sihaforma:siha#forma N-osa  "" ;
painutossihaforma:painutos#siha#forma N-osa  "" ;
läkkäämisforma:läkkäämis#forma N-osa  "" ;
adessivaforma:adessiva#forma N-osa  "" ;
loppuforma:loppu#forma N-osa  "" ;
sanomisforma:sanomis#forma N-osa  "" ;
norma:norma N-osa  "" ;
näkö:näkö N-mato  "" ;
maa:maa N-maa  "" ;
syntymämaa:syntymä#maa N-maa  "" ;
koi:koi N-maa  "" ;
soo:soo N-maa  "" ;
pii:pii N-maa  "" ;
pää:pää N-maa  "" ;
suu:suu N-maa  "" ;
syy:syy N-maa  "" ;
süü:süü N-maa  "" ;
tee:tee N-maa  "" ;
töö:töö N-maa  "" ;
töö:tyy N-maa  "" ;
töö:työ N-yö-Sg  "" ;
şkoulutöö:şkoulu#töö N-maa  "" ;
voi:voi N-maa  "" ;
vöö:vöö N-maa  "" ;
luu:luu N-maa  "" ;
kulttuuratöö:kulttuura#töö N-maa  "" ;
puu:puu N-maa  "" ;
öö:öö N-maa  "" ;
öö:yy N-maa  "" ;
öö:yö N-yö-Sg  "" ;
jää:jää N-maa  "" ;
sää:sää N-maa  "" ;
